Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1792.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-B.1RESIDENTIAL SOLAR ENERGY INCENTIVESSection 1701-B.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Residential solar energy system." A photovoltaic solar electric generation system installed on the premises of a primary residence located in Pennsylvania that is intended to supply electricity for use at the residence.Section 1702-B.1. Personal income tax credit for residential solar energy systems.(a) Credit authorized.--A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the personal income tax imposed by the Commonwealth for the taxable year in which a residential solar energy system is placed in service.(b) Amount of credit.--The credit shall be equal to 15% of the total cost incurred by the taxpayer for the purchase and installation of a residential solar energy system, not to exceed $2,500.(c) Carryforward.--If the credit allowed under subsection (a) exceeds the taxpayer's liability for the taxable year, the excess may be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's personal income tax liability for the succeeding three taxable years.(d) Certification.--The department shall require a taxpayer claiming the credit to provide proof of installation and system compliance with applicable Federal and State standards.Section 1703-B.1. Sales and use tax exemption for solar energy equipment.(a) Exemption.--The sale at retail and use of tangible personal property used exclusively in the installation or operation of residential solar energy systems shall be exempt from the taxes imposed by this act.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following 20250HB1792PN2202 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Tangible personal property." The term includes photovoltaic panels, inverters, batteries, mounting racks, wiring and associated equipment used in residential solar energy systems.Section 1704-B.1. Property tax assessment exclusion.(a) Exclusion authorized.--The increase in assessed value of real property attributable to the installation of a residential solar energy system shall be excluded from the assessed value of the property for purposes of real estate taxation.(b) Local option.--The exclusion under subsection (a) shall apply only if the governing body of the local taxing jurisdiction enacts an ordinance or resolution adopting the exclusion.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1792PN2202 - 3 - 123456789101112131415